Nebraska, session 109, LB156.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB156 LB156
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 13-910, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
13-910 The Political Subdivisions Tort Claims Act and sections
16-727, 16-728, 23-175, 39-809, and 79-610 shall not apply to:
(1) Any claim based upon an act or omission of an employee of a
political subdivision, exercising due care, in the execution of a
statute, ordinance, or officially adopted resolution, rule, or
regulation, whether or not such statute, ordinance, resolution, rule, or
regulation is valid;
(2) Any claim based upon the exercise or performance of or the
failure to exercise or perform a discretionary function or duty on the
part of the political subdivision or an employee of the political
subdivision, whether or not the discretion is abused;
(3) Any claim based upon the failure to make an inspection or making
an inadequate or negligent inspection of any property other than property
owned by or leased to such political subdivision to determine whether the
property complies with or violates any statute, ordinance, rule, or
regulation or contains a hazard to public health or safety unless the
political subdivision had reasonable notice of such hazard or the failure
to inspect or inadequate or negligent inspection constitutes a reckless
disregard for public health or safety;
(4) Any claim based upon the issuance, denial, suspension, or
revocation of or failure or refusal to issue, deny, suspend, or revoke
any permit, license, certificate, or order. Nothing in this subdivision
shall be construed to limit a political subdivision's liability for any
claim based upon the negligent execution by an employee of the political
subdivision in the issuance of a certificate of title under the Motor
Vehicle Certificate of Title Act and the State Boat Act except when such
title is issued upon an application filed electronically by an approved
licensed dealer participating in the electronic dealer services system
pursuant to section 60-1507;
-2-

LB156 LB156
2025 2025
(5) Any claim arising with respect to the assessment or collection
of any tax or fee or the detention of any goods or merchandise by any law
enforcement officer;
(6) Any claim caused by the imposition or establishment of a
quarantine by the state or a political subdivision, whether such
quarantine relates to persons or property;
(7) Any claim arising out of the following acts: Assault assault,
battery, false arrest, false imprisonment, malicious prosecution, abuse
of process, libel, slander, misrepresentation, deceit, or interference
with contract rights. This , except that this subdivision does not apply
to a claim:
(a) Under under the Healthy Pregnancies for Incarcerated Women Act;
or
(b) Arising out of a sexual assault of a child that occurred:
(i) On school grounds;
(ii) In a vehicle owned, leased, or contracted by a school and being
used for a school purpose;
(iii) In a vehicle being driven for a school purpose by a school
employee or person designated by the school; or
(iv) At a school-sponsored activity or athletic event;
(8) Any claim by an employee of the political subdivision which is
covered by the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act;
(9) Any claim arising out of the malfunction, destruction, or
unauthorized removal of any traffic or road sign, signal, or warning
device unless it is not corrected by the political subdivision
responsible within a reasonable time after actual or constructive notice
of such malfunction, destruction, or removal. Nothing in this subdivision
shall give rise to liability arising from an act or omission of any
political subdivision in placing or removing any traffic or road signs,
signals, or warning devices when such placement or removal is the result
of a discretionary act of the political subdivision;
-3-

LB156 LB156
2025 2025
(10) Any claim arising out of snow or ice conditions or other
temporary conditions caused by nature on any highway as defined in
section 60-624, bridge, public thoroughfare, or other public place due to
weather conditions. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to
limit a political subdivision's liability for any claim arising out of
the operation of a motor vehicle by an employee of the political
subdivision while acting within the course and scope of his or her
employment by the political subdivision;
(11) Any claim arising out of the plan or design for the
construction of or an improvement to any highway as defined in such
section or bridge, either in original construction or any improvement
thereto, if the plan or design is approved in advance of the construction
or improvement by the governing body of the political subdivision or some
other body or employee exercising discretionary authority to give such
approval;
(12) Any claim arising out of the alleged insufficiency or want of
repair of any highway as defined in such section, bridge, or other public
thoroughfare. Insufficiency or want of repair shall be construed to refer
to the general or overall condition and shall not refer to a spot or
localized defect. A political subdivision shall be deemed to waive its
immunity for a claim due to a spot or localized defect only if (a) the
political subdivision has had actual or constructive notice of the defect
within a reasonable time to allow repair prior to the incident giving
rise to the claim or (b) the claim arose during the time specified in a
notice provided by the political subdivision pursuant to subsection (3)
of section 39-1359 and the state or political subdivision had actual or
constructive notice; or
(13)(a) Any claim relating to recreational activities for which no
fee is charged (i) resulting from the inherent risk of the recreational
activity, (ii) arising out of a spot or localized defect of the premises
unless the spot or localized defect is not corrected by the political
-4-

LB156 LB156
2025 2025
subdivision leasing, owning, or in control of the premises within a
reasonable time after actual or constructive notice of the spot or
localized defect, or (iii) arising out of the design of a skatepark or
bicycle motocross park constructed for purposes of skateboarding, inline
skating, bicycling, or scootering that was constructed or reconstructed,
reasonably and in good faith, in accordance with generally recognized
engineering or safety standards or design theories in existence at the
time of the construction or reconstruction. For purposes of this
subdivision, a political subdivision shall be charged with constructive
notice only when the failure to discover the spot or localized defect of
the premises is the result of gross negligence.
(b) For purposes of this subdivision:
(i) Recreational activities include, but are not limited to, whether
as a participant or spectator: Hunting, fishing, swimming, boating,
camping, picnicking, hiking, walking, running, horseback riding, use of
trails, nature study, waterskiing, winter sports, use of playground
equipment, biking, roller blading, skateboarding, golfing, athletic
contests; visiting, viewing, or enjoying entertainment events, festivals,
or historical, archaeological, scenic, or scientific sites; and similar
leisure activities;
(ii) Inherent risk of recreational activities means those risks that
are characteristic of, intrinsic to, or an integral part of the activity;
(iii) Gross negligence means the absence of even slight care in the
performance of a duty involving an unreasonable risk of harm; and
(iv) Fee means a fee to participate in or be a spectator at a
recreational activity. A fee shall include payment by the claimant to any
person or organization other than the political subdivision only to the
extent the political subdivision retains control over the premises or the
activity. A fee shall not include payment of a fee or charge for parking
or vehicle entry.
(c) This subdivision, and not subdivision (3) of this section, shall
-5-

LB156 LB156
2025 2025
apply to any claim arising from the inspection or failure to make an
inspection or negligent inspection of premises owned or leased by the
political subdivision and used for recreational activities.
Sec. 2. Section 81-8,219, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-8,219 The State Tort Claims Act shall not apply to:
(1) Any claim based upon an act or omission of an employee of the
state, exercising due care, in the execution of a statute, rule, or
regulation, whether or not such statute, rule, or regulation is valid, or
based upon the exercise or performance or the failure to exercise or
perform a discretionary function or duty on the part of a state agency or
an employee of the state, whether or not the discretion is abused;
(2) Any claim arising with respect to the assessment or collection
of any tax or fee, or the detention of any goods or merchandise by any
law enforcement officer;
(3) Any claim for damages caused by the imposition or establishment
of a quarantine by the state whether such quarantine relates to persons
or property;
(4) Any claim arising out of the following acts: Assault assault,
battery, false imprisonment, false arrest, malicious prosecution, abuse
of process, libel, slander, or interference with contract rights. This ,
except that this subdivision does not apply to a claim:
(a) Under under the Healthy Pregnancies for Incarcerated Women Act;
or
(b) Arising out of a sexual assault of a child that occurred:
(i) On school grounds;
(ii) In a vehicle owned, leased, or contracted by a school and being
used for a school purpose;
(iii) In a vehicle being driven for a school purpose by a school
employee or person designated by the school; or
(iv) At a school-sponsored activity or athletic event;
-6-

LB156 LB156
2025 2025
(5) Any claim arising out of misrepresentation or deceit, except
that, in cases of adoption or placement, the State Tort Claims Act shall
apply to a claim arising out of misrepresentation or deceit by the
Department of Health and Human Services in failing to warn, notify, or
inform of a ward's mental and behavioral health history, educational
history, and medical history, including any history as a victim or
perpetrator of sexual abuse;
(6) Any claim by an employee of the state which is covered by the
Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act;
(7) Any claim based on activities of the Nebraska National Guard
when such claim is cognizable under the Federal Tort Claims Act, 28
U.S.C. 2674, or the federal National Guard Claims Act, 32 U.S.C. 715, or
when such claim accrues as a result of active federal service or state
service at the call of the Governor for quelling riots and civil
disturbances;
(8) Any claim based upon the failure to make an inspection or making
an inadequate or negligent inspection of any property other than property
owned by or leased to the state to determine whether the property
complies with or violates any statute, ordinance, rule, or regulation or
contains a hazard to public health or safety unless the state had
reasonable notice of such hazard or the failure to inspect or inadequate
or negligent inspection constitutes a reckless disregard for public
health or safety;
(9) Any claim based upon the issuance, denial, suspension, or
revocation of or failure or refusal to issue, deny, suspend, or revoke
any permit, license, certificate, or order. Such claim shall also not be
filed against a state employee acting within the scope of his or her
office. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to limit the
state's liability for any claim based upon the negligent execution by a
state employee in the issuance of a certificate of title under the Motor
Vehicle Certificate of Title Act and the State Boat Act except when such
-7-

LB156 LB156
2025 2025
title is issued upon an application filed electronically by an approved
licensed dealer participating in the electronic dealer services system
pursuant to section 60-1507;
(10) Any claim arising out of the malfunction, destruction, or
unauthorized removal of any traffic or road sign, signal, or warning
device unless it is not corrected by the governmental entity responsible
within a reasonable time after actual or constructive notice of such
malfunction, destruction, or removal. Nothing in this subdivision shall
give rise to liability arising from an act or omission of any
governmental entity in placing or removing any traffic or road signs,
signals, or warning devices when such placement or removal is the result
of a discretionary act of the governmental entity;
(11) Any claim arising out of snow or ice conditions or other
temporary conditions caused by nature on any highway as defined in
section 60-624, bridge, public thoroughfare, or other state-owned public
place due to weather conditions. Nothing in this subdivision shall be
construed to limit the state's liability for any claim arising out of the
operation of a motor vehicle by an employee of the state while acting
within the course and scope of his or her employment by the state;
(12) Any claim arising out of the plan or design for the
construction of or an improvement to any highway as defined in such
section or bridge, either in original construction or any improvement
thereto, if the plan or design is approved in advance of the construction
or improvement by the governing body of the governmental entity or some
other body or employee exercising discretionary authority to give such
approval;
(13) Any claim arising out of the alleged insufficiency or want of
repair of any highway as defined in such section, bridge, or other public
thoroughfare. Insufficiency or want of repair shall be construed to refer
to the general or overall condition and shall not refer to a spot or
localized defect. The state shall be deemed to waive its immunity for a
-8-

LB156 LB156
2025 2025
claim due to a spot or localized defect only if the state has had actual
or constructive notice of the defect within a reasonable time to allow
repair prior to the incident giving rise to the claim;
(14)(a) Any claim relating to recreational activities on property
leased, owned, or controlled by the state for which no fee is charged (i)
resulting from the inherent risk of the recreational activity, (ii)
arising out of a spot or localized defect of the premises unless the spot
or localized defect is not corrected within a reasonable time after
actual or constructive notice of the spot or localized defect, or (iii)
arising out of the design of a skatepark or bicycle motocross park
constructed for purposes of skateboarding, inline skating, bicycling, or
scootering that was constructed or reconstructed, reasonably and in good
faith, in accordance with generally recognized engineering or safety
standards or design theories in existence at the time of the construction
or reconstruction. For purposes of this subdivision, the state shall be
charged with constructive notice only when the failure to discover the
spot or localized defect of the premises is the result of gross
negligence.
(b) For purposes of this subdivision:
(i) Recreational activities include, but are not limited to, whether
as a participant or spectator: Hunting, fishing, swimming, boating,
camping, picnicking, hiking, walking, running, horseback riding, use of
trails, nature study, waterskiing, winter sports, use of playground
equipment, biking, roller blading, skateboarding, golfing, athletic
contests; visiting, viewing, or enjoying entertainment events, festivals,
or historical, archaeological, scenic, or scientific sites; and similar
leisure activities;
(ii) Inherent risk of recreational activities means those risks that
are characteristic of, intrinsic to, or an integral part of the activity;
(iii) Gross negligence means the absence of even slight care in the
performance of a duty involving an unreasonable risk of harm; and
-9-

LB156 LB156
2025 2025
(iv) Fee means a fee to participate in or be a spectator at a
recreational activity. A fee shall include payment by the claimant to any
person or organization other than the state only to the extent the state
retains control over the premises or the activity. A fee shall not
include payment of a fee or charge for parking or vehicle entry.
(c) This subdivision, and not subdivision (8) of this section, shall
apply to any claim arising from the inspection or failure to make an
inspection or negligent inspection of premises owned or leased by the
state and used for recreational activities; or
(15) Any claim arising as a result of a special event during a
period of time specified in a notice provided by a political subdivision
pursuant to subsection (3) of section 39-1359.
Sec. 3. Original sections 13-910 and 81-8,219, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-10-